Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1131.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-18 of the General Laws entitled "Sales and Use Taxes — Liability
and Computation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-18-41. Entertainment at large venues.
(a) The city or town council of any city or town is authorized to provide, by ordinance, for
the imposition of a tax on the sale of a ticket for admission to a large venue, not inconsistent with
this section.
(b) For purposes of this section, a “large venue” includes any entertainment venue that has
the capacity to hold at least eight hundred (800) patrons, seated.
(c) If authorized pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a tax of no
more than seven percent (7%) shall be imposed upon the sale of a ticket for admission to a large
venue. This tax shall be administered and collected by the division of taxation and shall be
redistributed to the municipality where the large venue is located.
(d) Taxes received by a municipality under this section shall not be included in the
calculation of a municipality’s maximum levy increase controlled by § 44-5-2.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003025
========